test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-riokkad_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup




Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - riõkkâd: # Verb 'to whip/piestä' - full paradigm
     riõkkâd+V+Inf: riõkˈkâd
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: riõkkam
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: riõkkak
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: reâkˈk
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: riõkˈkâp
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: riõkˈkveʹted
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: reäʹǩˈǩe
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: riõkkât
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: riõʹǩˈǩem
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: riõʹǩˈǩiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: riõkki
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: riõkkim
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: riõkkid
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: riõʹǩˈǩe
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: riõʹǩˈǩeš
     riõkkâd+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: riõkˈkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg1: riõkkžem
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg2: riõkkžiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg3: riõkkâž
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl1: riõkkžep
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl2: riõkkžid
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Pl3: riõkkže
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+Sg4: riõkkžet
     riõkkâd+V+Pot+ConNeg: riõkkže
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg1: riõkkčem
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg2: riõkkčiǩ
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg3: riõkkči
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl1: riõkkčim
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl2: riõkkčid
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Pl3: riõkkče
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+Sg4: riõkkčeš
     riõkkâd+V+Cond+ConNeg: riõkkče
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Sg2: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Sg3: reâkkas
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl1: riõkˈkâp
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl2: riõkˈkâd
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+Pl3: reâkˈkaz
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+2+ConNeg: riõkk
     riõkkâd+V+Imprt+13+ConNeg: riõkˈku
     riõkkâd+V+Actio+Ess: riõkˈkmen
     riõkkâd+V+Actio: riõkˈkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Act+PrsPrc: riõkˈki
     riõkkâd+V+Act+PrfPrc: riõkˈkâm
     riõkkâd+V+Pass+PrfPrc: riõkˈkum
     riõkkâd+V+VAbess: [riõkkʼǩeânai, riõkkʼkâni, riõkkʼkani, riõkkʼǩâni, riõkkʼǩani]
     riõkkâd+V+GerTemp: riõkkeen
     riõkkâd+V+GerInstr: riõkkeeʹl
